Utah statutes.
76-6-901.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Antiquities" means:

(a)  all material remains and their associations, recoverable through excavation or surface collection, that provide information pertaining to the historic or prehistoric peoples in the state; and

(b)  vertebrate fossils and other exceptional fossils and fossil sites designated as state landmarks.

(2)  "Landowner" includes the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration with respect to lands sold by the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration and upon which a restrictive deed covenant has been imposed by the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration.

(3)  "Persons" means an individual, corporation, partnership, trust, institution, association, or any other private entity or any officer, employee, agent, department, or instrumentality of the United States, of any Native American tribe, or of any state or political subdivision of any state.

(4)  "State lands" means all lands owned by:

(a)  Utah, including school and institutional trust lands and lands sold by the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration subject to a restrictive deed covenant for the protection of antiquities; and

(b)  political subdivisions.

